Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Indebtedness for Public Utility Purposes

§ 1821.
Definitions.

When used in this subchapter:

“Bond” means any bond or note issued by the municipal corporation and payable out of the net revenues from the operation of a public utility project.

“Cost of operation and maintenance” shall mean the expenses for operation, maintenance, repairs, and ordinary replacements properly and directly attributable to the operation or ordinary maintenance of the public utility project.

“Net revenues” shall mean revenues less cost of operation and maintenance.

“Project” shall mean an undertaking for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, financing, enlargement, extension, or betterment of any of the following public utility systems:

Water systems or facilities as defined in chapter 89 of this title.

Sewage disposal systems or facilities as defined in chapter 97 or 101 of this title.

Systems or facilities for the generation, production, transmission, or distribution of gas (natural, artificial, or mixed) for lighting, heating, or power for public and private uses, as provided in 30 V.S.A. chapter 79 or by charter or special act.

Systems or facilities for the generation, production, transmission, or distribution of electric energy, including the ownership, operation, and management of a municipal plant as defined in

30 V.S.A. § 2901

and other generation, production, transmission, and distribution facilities located within and without the State.

Systems, facilities, and equipment for the collection, treatment, or disposal of solid waste, including sanitary landfills, and the generation, transmission, distribution, and sale of all products and forms of energy derived therefrom.

“Revenues” mean all revenues, rates, fees, charges, rents, or other income and receipts received by the municipal corporation from any source, or accrued to the municipal corporation, or any department, board, or agency thereof, in connection with the management and operation of a public utility project or system, and shall also include any interest received on any monies or securities of the municipal corporation which are pledged to the payment of the municipal corporation’s bonds, and any federal or State grants-in-aid with respect to such project or system.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 111

, § 5, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 1822.
Powers; approval of voters.

In addition to the powers it may now or hereafter have, a municipal corporation otherwise authorized to own, acquire, improve, control, operate, or manage a public utility or project and to issue bonds pursuant to this subchapter, may also, by action of its legislative branch, exercise any of the following powers:

to borrow money and issue bonds for the purposes of acquiring, improving, maintaining, financing, controlling, or operating the public utility or project, or for the purpose of selling, furnishing, or distributing the services, facilities, products, or commodities of such utility or project;

to enter into contracts in connection with the issuance of bonds for any of the purposes enumerated in subdivision (1) of this subsection;

to purchase, hold, and dispose of any of its bonds;

to pledge or assign all or part of any net revenues of the public utility or project, to provide for or to secure the payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds issued in connection with such public utility or project;

to do any and all things necessary or prudent to carry out the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in this subchapter, including without limitation those powers enumerated in section 1824 of this title.

The bonds authorized under this section shall be in such form, shall contain such provisions, and shall be executed as may be determined by the legislative branch of the municipal corporation, but shall not be executed, issued, or made, and shall not be valid and binding, unless and until at least a majority of the legal voters of such municipal corporation present and voting at a duly warned annual or special meeting called for that purpose shall have first voted to authorize the same.
(b) (1) The bonds authorized under this section shall be in such form, shall contain such provisions, and shall be executed as may be determined by the legislative branch of the municipal corporation, but shall not be executed, issued, or made, and shall not be valid and binding, unless and until at least a majority of the legal voters of such municipal corporation present and voting at a duly warned annual or special meeting called for that purpose shall have first voted to authorize the same.

The warning calling such a meeting shall state the purpose for which it is proposed to issue bonds, the estimated cost of the project, the amount of bonds proposed to be issued under this subchapter therefor, that such bonds are to be payable solely from net revenues, and shall fix the place where and the date on which such meetings shall be held and the hours of opening and closing the polls.

The notice of the meeting shall be published and posted as provided in section 1756 of this title.

When a majority of all the voters voting on the question at such meeting vote to authorize the issuance of bonds under this subchapter to pay for such project, the legislative body shall be authorized to issue bonds or enter into contracts, pledges, and assignments as provided in this subchapter.

Sections 1757 and 1758 of this title shall apply to the proceedings taken hereunder, except that the form of ballot to be used shall be substantially as follows:

Click to view

The bonds authorized by this subchapter shall be sold at par, premium, or discount by negotiated sale, competitive bid, or to the Vermont Municipal Bond Bank.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the legislative branch of a municipal corporation owning a municipal plant as defined in

30 V.S.A. § 2901

may authorize by resolution the issuance of bonds in an amount not to exceed 50 percent of the total assets of said municipal plant without the need for voter approval. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted as eliminating the requirement for approval from the Public Utility Commission pursuant to

30 V.S.A. § 108

, where applicable.

Shall bonds of the (name of municipality) to the amount of $ be issued under subchapter 2 of chapter 53 of Title 24, Vermont Statutes Annotated, payable only from net revenues derived from the (type) public utility system, for the purpose of paying for the following public utility project? If in favor of the bond issue, make a cross (x) in this square •. If opposed to the bond issue, make a cross (x) in this square •.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 111

, § 6, eff. June 22, 1989;

2019, No. 81

, § 1.

§ 1823.
Payment exclusive; effect.

The bonds issued and contracts entered into in connection therewith as authorized in section 1822 of this title and the interest thereon shall be payable solely and exclusively from net revenues derived from the public utility system or project and shall not constitute general indebtedness of the municipal corporation nor be an obligation or liability upon the municipal corporation to pay the same from any funds of the municipal corporation other than such net revenues. No holder or holders of any contracts entered into or bonds issued under this subchapter shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the municipal corporation to pay such contracts or bonds, or the interest thereon. A statement referring to the limited nature of the contract or bond and reciting that it had been entered into or issued under this subchapter shall be made plainly to appear in or upon each contract or bond.

The bonds or contracts authorized by this subchapter shall not be affected by the restrictions and limitations of subchapter 1 of this chapter relating thereto.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 111

, § 7, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 1824.
Specific provisions.

Generally. Any pledge of net revenues or bond proceeds and earnings thereon made by a municipal corporation under this subchapter shall be binding from the time when the pledge is made. Net revenues or bond proceeds and earnings thereon to be pledged and thereafter received by the municipal corporation shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any pledge shall be binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the municipal corporation, irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the municipal corporation.

Special covenants. The contracts and bonds entered into and issued under section 1822 of this title may contain provisions relating to:

pledging all or any part of the net revenues of the public utility system or project in order to secure the payment of the bonds, or any part thereof, subject to such agreements with bondholders as may then exist;

the imposition or maintenance of rates, fees, or charges, subject to regulatory requirements, to generate revenues at least sufficient to provide for the costs of operation and maintenance of the public utility system and for payment of principal of and interest on all bonds issued in connection with such public utility as the same shall become due;

the imposition or maintenance of rates, fees, and charges, subject to regulatory requirements, as a multiple of principal and interest payments on bonds of the municipality issued under this subchapter;

periodic review of the financial condition of the public utility system for the purpose of estimating whether its revenues will be sufficient to comply with agreements with the holders of its bonds;

limitations, terms, and conditions with respect to the refunding or redemption of the bonds;

limitations, terms, and conditions with respect to the issuance of additional bonds in connection with the public utility system for which the bonds are issued, except bonds secured by a subordinate pledge of net revenues;

limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of bonds may be applied and pledging the proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds or of any issue thereof;

the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any agreement with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which consent may be given;

requirements for the maintenance and operation of the utility system in accordance with prudent utility practice and regulatory requirements;

vesting in a trustee or trustees, within or without the State, the right to receive all or any part of the net revenue pledged and assigned to, or for the benefit of, the holder or holders of bonds issued hereunder, and to hold, apply, and dispose of the same; and vesting in the trustee or trustees such rights, powers, and duties in trust as the trustee may need to recover the amounts pledged to the holders of the municipal corporation’s bonds and to enforce any covenants made by the municipal corporation to secure its bonds, and limiting or abrogating the right of the holders of its bonds to appoint a trustee under this subchapter or limiting the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee;

prescribing what acts or omissions of the municipality shall constitute “events of default” and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of such bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

limitations on the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, conditions, or obligations;

a definition, subject to regulatory requirements, of the standard of care, maintenance, and operation of the public utility project, including the maintenance of insurance and the application of proceeds of policies of insurance and condemnation awards thereon;

the pledge of proceeds to be derived upon the sale or disposition of the public utility project for the purpose of paying bonds issued by the municipal corporation for such project or defeasing the lien securing said bonds;

limitations on the right of the municipal corporation to encumber, sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of property used in public service operations of the public utility system; except for the sale, lease, or disposition of a part of such property, which in the reasonable judgment of the municipality has become unserviceable, obsolete, worn out, or no longer necessary in the operations of the public utility system or has been replaced by other property, and except for encumbrances in connection with bonds secured by a subordinate pledge of net revenues;

the bonds to be issued, the issuance of its bonds in escrow or otherwise, and the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof; provisions for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds; prohibitions against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon and to redeem its bonds and provisions for their redemption and the terms and conditions thereof; and

the creation of special funds for construction or operating costs, debt service, reserve, or similar purposes and covenanting as to the use and disposition and investment of the monies held in such funds.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 111

, § 8, eff. June 22, 1989;

2017, No. 74

, § 94.

§ 1825.
Construction.

Nothing contained in this subchapter shall be so construed as authorizing the establishment or operation of a public utility.
The provisions of this subchapter shall apply only to a public utility authorized by a special act or under the general law.
Bonds may be issued hereunder for public utility projects of the municipal corporation notwithstanding that any other law may provide for the issuance of bonds for like purposes.
This subchapter is remedial in nature and the powers hereby granted shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes hereof, and to this end the municipal corporation shall have powers necessary and prudent to carry out the purposes hereof in addition to the powers expressly conferred in this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 111

, § 9, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 1826.
Actions barred.

No action shall be brought directly or indirectly attacking, questioning, or in any manner contesting the legality or validity of municipal revenue bonds for public utility purposes, issued or unissued, voted by any municipality or by any other municipal corporate entity, after six months from the date upon which voters in any such municipality or other municipal corporate entity met pursuant to warning and voted affirmatively to issue bonds to defray costs of municipal utility purposes or upon vote of a question of recission thereof whichever occurs later.

This section shall be liberally construed to effect the legislative purpose to validate bonds issued or authorized by municipalities or other municipal corporate entities for public utility purposes, and to bar every right to question in any manner the validity of a bond voted by it for public utility purposes, and to bar every remedy therefor notwithstanding any defects or irregularities, jurisdictional or otherwise, after expiration of the six-month period.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 57

, § 2, eff. April 18, 1975.

§ 1827.
Enforcement of bond obligations.

The municipal corporation shall have power by resolution of its legislative body, adopted in connection with the issuance of the bonds and subject to approval under

30 V.S.A. § 108

to confer upon any holder or holders of a specified amount or percentage of bonds, including a trustee or trustees for such holders, the right in the event of an “event of default” as defined in any contract with the holder or holders of such bonds or the trustee or trustees therefor:

By suit, action, or proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction to obtain the appointment of a receiver of the public utility system of the municipal corporation or any part or parts thereof. If such receiver be appointed he or she may enter and take possession of such public utility system of the municipal corporation or any part or parts thereof and operate and maintain the same, and collect and receive all revenues thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the municipal corporation itself might do and shall deposit such monies in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of the municipal corporation as the court shall direct. All actions of receivers authorized under this section shall be subject to the same regulatory requirements applicable to the municipal utility. Provided, however, that notwithstanding the appointment of a receiver the municipal corporation shall retain the right subject to regulatory requirements to fix the rates, fees, and charges to be charged by the public utility system, the revenues from which are pledged to pay bonds and the interest thereon, and to receive from the receiver from time to time that portion of any revenues collected which shall be allocable to the municipal corporation on account of costs for public utility system maintenance, operation, repair, and regulation or other costs payable by the municipal corporation.

By suit, action, or proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction to require the legislative body of the municipal corporation and the treasurer of the municipal corporation to account as if it, he, or she were the trustee of an express trust. Any such resolution shall constitute a contract between the municipal corporation and the holders of bonds of such issue.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 111

, § 10, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 1828.
Rights of holders.

Any holder or holders of bonds issued under this subchapter, including a trustee or trustees for holders of such bonds, shall have the right in addition to all other rights:

By extraordinary relief or other suit, action, or proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce his, her, or their rights against the municipal corporation, the legislative body, any other proper officer, agent, or employee of any of them, including the right to require the municipality, the legislative body, and any proper officer, agent, or employee of any of them, to the extent consistent with the reasonable operation of a public utility, to fix and collect rates and charges subject to State and federal regulatory approval, adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of revenues, and to require the municipal corporation, the legislative body and any officer, agent, or employee of any of them to carry out any other covenants or agreements and to perform its and their duties under this subchapter.

By action or suit to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or a violation of the rights of such holder of bonds.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 111

, § 11, eff. June 22, 1989.